Vermont, session 2025-2026, H166.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 115 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 115. HUNTING WITH DOGS; MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS
Subchapter 1. Definitions
§ 5000. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Accompany” or “accompanied” means to be within hearing
distance or visual contact of a dog without the use of any visual or audio
enhancement devices and not more than 150 feet from the dogs at all times.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 2 of 13
Electronic remote equipment does not qualify as and is not a substitute for
accompaniment.
(2) “At large” or “running at large” means a hunting dog is off the
owner’s property, not on-leash, and unaccompanied, unsupervised, or not in
the presence of the owner or permittee.
(3) “Attack” means that dogs used for hunting and pursuing black bears
and furbearers exhibit the following behaviors: chasing a person, a domestic
animal, or livestock in an aggressive manner and without provocation;
approaching a person, domestic pet, or domestic animal with the intent to
chase, bite, or cause injure; or behave in a way, alone or in a pack, that causes
a reasonable fear of injury or harm to a person, domestic pet, or domestic
animal.
(4) “Control of dog” or “control” means that while hunting and pursuing
black bears and furbearers with the aid of a dog, the owner or permittee shall
maintain visual contact with the dog; shall be able to hear the dogs at all times;
or shall have physical control over the dog with a leash or long lead. A dog is
only controlled on-leash or lead if the handler is physically capable of or able
to restrain the dog. Global positioning system collars or similar devices do not
meet the requirements of control under this section.
(5) “Domestic animal” has the same meaning as in 6 V.S.A. § 1151(2).
(6) “Domestic pet” has the same meaning as in section 4001 of this title.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 3 of 13
(7) “Fur-bearing species” or “furbearer” has the same meaning as in
section 4001 of this title.
(8) “In the presence of” means within hearing distance or visual contact
with the dogs under conditions that allow the handler to take immediate action
to control them.
(9) “Supervised” or “supervision” means that a person at all times
remains within visual sight or hearing distance of a dog, remains within 150
feet of the dog, and is physically able to control the dog.
Subchapter 2. Field Trials
§ 5001. HUNTING DOGS; FIELD TRAINING
(a) While accompanying the dog, a person may train a hunting dog to hunt
and pursue:
(1) bear during the period from June 1 to September 15 and then only
from sunrise to sunset;
(2) rabbits and game birds during the period from June 1 to the last
Saturday in September and then only from sunrise to sunset;
(3) raccoon during the period from June 1 through any time of day or
night on the day before the opening day of raccoon hunting season; and
(4) bobcat and fox during the period June 1 to March 15, except during
regular deer season as prescribed in section 4741 of this title.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 4 of 13
(b) The Commissioner may permit a person to train and condition a hunting
dog between the second Monday in March and June 1. The Board may adopt
rules as it considers necessary to control the training and conditioning of
hunting dogs.
(c) A person training a hunting dog under this section may possess a
handgun while training the hunting dog, provided that the person shall not take
game by any method while training the hunting dog. As used in this section,
“handgun” means a pistol or revolver that will expel a projectile by the action
of an explosive.
§ 5002. HUNTING DOGS; FIELD TRIALS; FEE
The Commissioner may issue permits to organized groups to hold field
trials for hunting dogs. Persons seeking a permit shall submit an application to
the Commissioner as prescribed by the Commissioner and shall pay a fee of
$50.00.
§ 5003. RETRIEVING DOGS; FIELD TRIALS
The Commissioner may issue a license to any responsible person or field
trial group to hold a field trial for retrieving dogs, or bird dogs, with game
birds that have been propagated or legally acquired and released on the day of
the trial on premises owned or controlled by the individual or group
conducting the same, and shot for such purposes during daylight hours. Such
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 5 of 13
trials shall be held under the supervision of the Department of Fish and
Wildlife.
§ 5004. RETRIEVER FIELD TRIALS; FEE
The Commissioner may issue permits which shall authorize a holder or
authorized designee to take all of the birds released by the holder of the permit
or designee on the day the trial is in progress. Persons seeking a permit shall
submit an application to the Commissioner as prescribed by the Commissioner,
and shall pay a fee of $50.00.
§ 5006. EXEMPTION; HUNTING LICENSE
Any person who participates in a trial under the provisions of sections
5002–5004 of this title shall not be required to have a hunting license.
Subchapter 3. Hunting Bear or Coyote with Dogs
§ 5007. HUNTING BLACK BEAR WITH DOGS
(a) No person shall pursue black bear with the aid of dogs, either for
training or taking purposes, without a permit issued by the Commissioner. A
Vermont resident shall not pursue black bear with the aid of dogs for training
purposes without a permit issued by the Commissioner. The number of take
permits issued to nonresidents in any given year shall not exceed 10 percent of
the number of take permits issued to residents in the preceding year. The
Commissioner shall establish a process for determining which nonresidents are
to receive a take permit if there are more nonresident applicants than
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 6 of 13
nonresident permits. A nonresident may train dogs to hunt bear only while
training season is in effect in the nonresident’s home state and subject to the
laws and regulations of this State.
(b) Permits will be issued to residents for a fee of $50.00.
(c) Application fees The application fee for nonresidents a nonresident take
permit shall be $10.00 with a nonresident take permit fee of $200.00 for
successful applicants.
§ 5008. HUNTING COYOTE WITH AID OF DOGS; PERMIT
(a) No person shall pursue coyote with the aid of dogs, either for training or
taking purposes, without a permit issued by the Commissioner. A Vermont
resident shall not pursue coyote with the aid of dogs for training purposes
without a permit issued by the Commissioner.
(1) The Commissioner may deny any permit at the Commissioner’s
discretion. The Commissioner shall not issue more than 100 permits annually.
(2) The number of take permits that the Commissioner issues to
nonresidents in any given year shall not exceed 10 percent of the number of
take permits issued to residents in the preceding year. The Commissioner shall
establish a process and standards for determining which nonresidents are to
receive a take permit, including who will receive a take permit if there are
more nonresident applicants than nonresident permits.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 7 of 13
(3) A nonresident may train dogs to pursue coyote only while the
training season is in effect in the nonresident’s home state and subject to the
requirements of this part and rules adopted under this part. [Repealed.]
(b)(1) The Commissioner shall issue permits under this section to a resident
for a fee of $50.00.
(2) The application fee for a nonresident take permit issued under this
section shall be $10.00, and the fee for a nonresident take permit issued under
this section shall be $200.00 for a successful applicant.
§ 5009. PURSUING COYOTE WITH AID OF DOGS; LANDOWNER
PERMISSION
(a) A person shall not release a dog onto land posted in accordance with
section 5201 of this title for the purpose of pursuing coyote with the aid of
dogs unless the dog owner or handler of the hunting dog has obtained a
courtesy permission card from the landowner or landowner’s agent allowing
the pursuit of coyote with the aid of dogs on the land.
(b) A person shall not release onto land a dog for the purpose of pursuing
coyote with the aid of dogs if in the previous 365 days a dog had been
previously found on the land, and the dog owner, a handler of the dog, or a
person participating in the hunt has been personally informed by law
enforcement that hunting dogs are not permitted on the property.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 8 of 13
(c)(1) For a first offense, a person who violates this section shall have
committed a minor fish and wildlife violation and shall be assessed a five-point
violation under subdivision 4502(b)(1) of this title.
(2) For a second or subsequent violation of this section, a person shall
be assessed a 10-point violation under subdivision 4502(b)(2) of this title and
shall be fined under section 4515 of this title. [Repealed.]
Subchapter 4. General Requirements; Access to Land
§ 5021. SUPERVISION AND CONTROL OF DOGS; TRAINING AND
HUNTING
(a) A person shall not use a dog of any breed or sex at any time for the
purpose of hunting or training the dog to hunt a black bear or fur-bearing
species unless the person has direct supervision of the dog.
(b) A person using a dog for hunting or training to pursue black bears or
fur-bearing species shall supervise and control the dog by maintaining visual or
auditory contact with the dog at all times.
§ 5022. LANDOWNER PERMISSION
(a) A person shall not allow dogs used for hunting or training of any
species to run at large on private property where pets or domestic animals are
kept or pastured without prior written permission of the owner of the property.
(b) A person using dogs for hunting or training to pursue black bears or fur-
bearing species on private property shall obtain written permission from the
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 9 of 13
property owner or lawful occupant before releasing the dogs on the private
property.
(c) The written permission required under this section shall be carried by
the person hunting or training with dogs at all times while engaged in the
activity and shall be presented upon request by law enforcement or a game
warden.
§ 5023. COLLAR REQUIREMENTS AND NOTIFICATION
(a) A person shall not hunt or train a dog on black bears or fur-bearing
species unless the dog has a collar with a functioning global positioning system
tracker that legibly provides the name, telephone number, and address of the
owner of the dog or the permittee authorized to use the dog.
(b) A person who owns dogs to hunt or train black bear or fur-bearing
species or a person permitted to use dogs to hunt or train shall notify the town
in which the dogs will be used to hunt or train of the breeds and number of
dogs to be used, the proposed location of training or hunting, and the days and
times when training or hunting will occur.
§ 5024. DAMAGE TO PROPERTY
A person shall not, while training, pursuing, or hunting black bears or fur-
bearing species with dogs, enter upon the land of another or damage any
private property without prior written permission of the property owner.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 10 of 13
§ 5025. SIGNAGE
(a) When pursuing black bears and furbearers with dogs, the owner of the
dogs or the person permitted to use the dogs shall post signs along roadways
and on the property where the dogs are present that read “Caution Hunting
Dogs.” The signs shall be a minimum of 12 inches by 12 inches and shall be
printed with blaze orange letters on a yellow background. The signs shall be
posted at least 40 inches above the ground and shall be placed at intervals not
exceeding 1,000 feet apart.
(b) The owner of the dogs or the person permitted to use the dogs shall bear
the cost and maintenance of signs and shall not block driveways, intersections,
or rights of way with the signs. A person shall not post the signs required by
this section on private roads or private property without prior permission of the
property owner.
§ 5026. REPORTING OF INCIDENTS, INJURIES, OR ATTACKS
(a) A person hunting black bears or fur-bearing species with dogs or
training dogs to pursue black bears or fur-bearing species shall immediately
report to a game warden or law enforcement any incident when the dogs injure
or attack a person, domestic pet, or domestic animal.
(b) A report required under subsection (a) of this section shall include:
(1) the date, time, and location of the incident; and
(2) the names and contact information of all parties involved.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 11 of 13
§ 5027. NONRESIDENT RESTRICTIONS ON TRAINING
A nonresident of Vermont shall not train dogs to hunt black bears or fur-
bearing species during training season.
§ 5028. DAMAGES
The owner of dogs used to hunt black bear of fur-bearing species or the
person permitted to use dogs to hunt black bear or fur-bearing species shall be
liable for all damages to animals or people caused by hunting the dogs the
owner or person is required to supervise. If the owner of a dog or person
authorized to use a dog damages animals or people a second or subsequent
time while hunting bear or fur-bearing species with the dogs, the owner or the
dogs or the person authorized to use the dogs shall permittees shall be liable
for double the amount of the damages.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. UNIFORM POINT SYSTEM; REVOCATION OF LICENSE
(a) A uniform point system that assigns points to those convicted of a
violation of a provision of this part is established. The conviction report from
the court shall be prima facie evidence of the points assessed. In addition to
other penalties assessed for violation of fish and wildlife statutes, the
Commissioner shall suspend licenses issued under this part that are held by a
person who has accumulated 10 or more points in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 12 of 13
(b) A person violating provisions of this part shall receive points for
convictions in accordance with the following schedule (all sections are in this
title of the Vermont Statutes Annotated):
(1) Except for biological collection violations determined to be nonpoint
violations under the rules of the Board, five points shall be assessed for any
violation of statutes or rules adopted under this part except those listed in
subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) Ten points shall be assessed for:
* * *
(TT) § 4716. Participating in a coyote-hunting competition.
(UU) chapter 115, subchapter 4. Violating requirements for hunting
or training with dogs.
(3) Twenty points shall be assessed for:
(A) § 4192. General powers and duties; failure to obey warden
* * *
(4) In addition to other points assessed under this subsection, a person
shall be assessed one point for each fish, bird, animal, or pelt possessed, taken,
transported, bought, or sold in excess of the limits established in statutes or
rules adopted under this part.
(c) Licenses shall be suspended as follows:
VT LEG #379823 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.166
2025 Page 13 of 13
(1) For 10 to 14 points accumulated in five years—a one-year
suspension.
(2) For 15 to 19 points accumulated in five years—a two-year
suspension.
(3) For 20 or more points accumulated in five years—a three-year
suspension.
* * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 4712(a) is amended to read:
(a) The Commissioner may certify an individual to use a dog on a leash to
track injured wild animals, consistent with the requirements of chapter 115,
subchapter 4 of this title. The certificate shall be valid for five years from date
of issuance. The Commissioner shall establish the following by rule:
(1) procedures for issuing a certificate under this section;
(2) qualifications required for certification under this section;
(3) privileges granted to a person holding a certificate under this section.
Sec. 4. REPEAL OF FISH AND WILDLIFE BOARD RULES
10 V.S.A. App. §§ 3.1 (definition of supervise), 3.6 (definition of control of
dogs), and 4.20.7 (land owner permission requirements) are repealed.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379823 v.1